Idaho, session 2026, S1292.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-1211C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1211C. FOSTER PARENT TRAINING.
(1)(a) Each caregiver Prior to licensure pursuant to this chapter, each
applicant, unless exempted, shall complete the following:
(i) training Training on knowledge and skills relating to the
reasonable and prudent parent standard as set forth in chapter 16,
title 16, Idaho Code.;
(ii) Orientation to foster care programs;
(iii) Training on understanding the impact of trauma on children;
(iv) Training on behavior management;
(v) Training on working with birth parents;
(vi) Training on court processes; and
(vii) Training on the physical safety of children in foster care.
(b) The required training described in this subsection shall not exceed
ten (10) hours total, and each training shall include a check on learn-
ing to ensure understanding.
(2) The department shall make training available on an ongoing basis
to all foster parents on the following topics: rights, roles, and respon-
sibilities of foster parents; laws and regulations; the impact of childhood
trauma; managing child behaviors; first aid and medication administration;
gun safety in foster homes; and the importance of maintaining meaningful
connections between the child and parents, including regular visitation.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.